West Virginia, session 2025, SB867.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 5. miscellaneous provisions. §9-5-29a.  Prohibition against payments to certain residential substance use disorder facilities; Requirement for licensure and accreditation; and rulemaking. (a) Effective January 1, 2026 July 1, 2025, unless otherwise mandated by federal law or regulation, neither the Bureau for Medical Services, nor any managed care organization contracted to provide services on behalf of the bureau, shall reimburse providers for services rendered on or after January 1, 2026 July 1, 2025, at a residential substance use disorder treatment facility unless:At the time treatment was rendered, the facility site was actively:(A) Licensed by the West Virginia Office of Health Facility Licensure and Certification; and (B) Accredited by the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities International (CARF), the Joint Commission, or Det Norske Veritas (DNV) to operate an inpatient facility that provides behavioral health services.(b) No later than October 1, 2025, the Bureau for Medical Services shall make all necessary filings with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and submit for public comment any changes to its provider manual that are necessary to ensure the ability to enforce the provisions of subsection (a) of this code section.  (c) Residential substance use disorder facilities shall obtain both licensure and accreditation as required by subsection (a) of this section by January 1, 2026 July 1, 2025. Any residential substance use disorder facility beginning new operations as a result of a lawful change in ownership, or opening a facility at a new site, shall be required to comply with the requirements of this section to be accredited with CARF, the Joint Commission, or DNV, within one year of its start of operations.  However, the Office of Health Facility Licensure and Certification licensure requirement in subsection (a) of this section, all other applicable state laws and regulations, and requirements of the bureau required to be eligible for reimbursement for residential substance use disorder services, shall be applicable during this one year period. (d) All licensed substance abuse treatment beds are subject to the provisions of §16-2D-9(5) of this code.(e) The Office of the Inspector General shall propose or amend a rule for legislative approval in accordance with the provisions of §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code to implement the provisions of this section. (f) The Bureau for Medical Services shall prepare a report to the Legislative Oversight Commission on Health and Human Resources Accountability on or before December 31, 2030.   That report shall provide data on the effectiveness of the provisions of this section. (g) Effective July 1, 2031, the provisions of this section shall expire and have no further force or effect unless continued by act of the Legislature.